Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 7 Sidewalks

24-7-1.
Power of towns to establish and regulate sidewalks.

The town council of any town shall have the power to order sidewalks, including curbing of stone or other material, made and laid in and upon the streets and highways of the town, and may make ordinances and regulations relative to the altering or repairing thereof, to the use, maintenance, care, and cleaning of the sidewalks, to removing ice and snow therefrom, to the removal of posts, steps, and other obstructions therein, and to the maintenance and removal of awnings, signs, and other structures projecting over the sidewalks; provided, that the ordinances and regulations shall not be contrary to the laws of this state.

The construction of sidewalks and curbs to be owned by all cities and towns and the maintenance of all sidewalks and curbs owned by all cities and towns, shall be in compliance with all state regulations promulgated by the director of transportation pursuant to subsection

42-13-1(b)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-1

; P.L. 2010, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 213, § 1.

24-7-2.
Order to lay sidewalk — Notice and hearing.

Whenever the town council shall determine by its vote that a sidewalk shall be made and laid in and upon any street or highway in the town, they may order the sidewalk to be made and laid upon like notice to the abutting landowner, as is provided in §

24-3-23

. At the same time and place named in the notice, the town council shall proceed to hear all the parties and to make and pass an order in reference to the making and laying of the sidewalk as they may think proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-2

.

24-7-3.
Division of costs between town and landowners.

Whenever any sidewalk in and upon any street or highway shall be ordered made and laid as provided in §

24-7-2

, the owners of the land abutting on the sidewalk shall pay one-half (1/2) the costs thereof to be set against their respective lands, and the town shall pay the balance of the costs thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 58.

24-7-4.
Collection of costs from landowners.

Costs of the sidewalk shall be ascertained by the commissioner of highways for the town and shall be submitted by the commissioner to, and be approved by, the town council, and thereafter the commissioner of highways shall demand the costs from the abutting landowner, and if the owner shall neglect and refuse to pay the costs, the commissioner of highways shall certify the costs so ascertained and approved to the assessors of taxes for the town, and the assessors shall include the cost of making and laying the sidewalk in the next assessment of taxes for the town against the land or the owner thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-4

.

24-7-5.
Appeal of assessment.

Whenever any abutting landowner shall deem himself or herself aggrieved by the assessment of any tax for the making and laying of any sidewalk, as provided in §

24-7-4

, the landowner may appeal therefrom, according to provisions of law with reference to appeals from town councils.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-5

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 58.

24-7-6.
Judgment and costs on appeal.

If the person appealing from any assessment of taxes for the making and laying of any sidewalk shall fail to have the taxes reduced on appeal, he or she shall be adjudged to pay the costs of suit, and the collector of taxes in the town may proceed to collect the taxes as if the appeal had not been taken, but if the appellant shall succeed in having the tax reduced, the appellant shall recover costs, and the collector of taxes shall collect from the appellant only so much of the tax as shall have been found on appeal to be due from the appellant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-6

.

24-7-7.
Penalties for violation of regulations.

The town council may prescribe and impose penalties for the violation of the ordinances and regulations herein provided for not exceeding an amount of twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-7

.

24-7-8.
Sidewalks along state highways.

Nothing in this chapter shall be held to oust the state of jurisdiction over any such sidewalks and curbing as may be made, laid, or constructed upon state highways within a town, but no sidewalks or curbing on state highways shall be made, laid, or constructed without the approval of the director of transportation first being had and obtained as to the feasibility, location, type, and time of construction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 58.

24-7-9.
Permits for telephone booths and equipment — Exception.

In addition to all powers heretofore granted each city and town by charter or by the public laws of the state with respect to the maintenance and use of the sidewalks and the public highways and streets within the cities and towns, the city council of any city and the town council of any town is hereby empowered by ordinance to authorize the placing and maintenance of telephone booths, telephones, and their appurtenances within the limits of any sidewalk or public highway or street within the bounds of the city or town, and to designate a city or town official from time to time to issue permits therefor; and provided, further, that this section shall not apply to the placing and maintenance of the poles, wires, conduits, and other equipment of any telephone company within the limits of any sidewalk or public highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 125, § 1.

24-7-10.
Westerly exempt.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the town of Westerly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1224, § 10; P.L. 1930, ch. 1611, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 348, § 9; P.L. 1950, ch. 2427, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-7-9

; P.L. 1961, ch. 125, § 1.

24-7-11.
William J. George Steps.

The Ocean Road steps at Matunuck Point in the town of South Kingstown shall be named and known as the “William J. George Steps”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 389, § 1.